Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE F. COMMERCE AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT

CHAPTER 490E. TASK FORCE ON ECONOMIC GROWTH AND ENDANGERED SPECIES

Sec. 490E.001. PURPOSE. The purpose of this chapter is to establish a mechanism for state agencies to provide policy and technical assistance regarding compliance with endangered species laws and regulations to local and regional governmental entities and their communities engaged in economic development activities so that compliance with endangered species laws and regulations is as effective and cost efficient as possible.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 490E.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Endangered species" has the meaning assigned by Section 68.002, Parks and Wildlife Code.

(2) "Task force" means the interagency task force on economic growth and endangered species created under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 490E.003. CREATION. (a) The task force on economic growth and endangered species is created and is composed of:

(1) the comptroller;

(2) the commissioner of agriculture;

(3) the executive director of the Parks and Wildlife Department;

(4) the executive director of the Texas Department of Transportation; and

(5) the executive director of the State Soil and Water Conservation Board.

(b) The comptroller is the presiding officer of the task force.

(c) The task force shall meet as often as necessary to fulfill its duties under this chapter.

(d) New members may be added to the task force by the unanimous consent of the existing members.

(e) A member of the task force may designate another person to act on the member's behalf.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 490E.004. FUNCTIONS AND DUTIES. (a) The task force may:

(1) assess the economic impact on the state of federal, state, or local regulations relating to endangered species;

(2) assist landowners and other persons in this state to identify, evaluate, and implement cost-efficient strategies for mitigation of impacts to and recovery of endangered species that will promote economic growth and development in this state; and

(3) facilitate state and local governmental efforts to effectively implement endangered species regulations in a cost-efficient manner.

(b) If requested by a local government or a state official, the task force may review state and local governmental efforts to address endangered species issues and provide recommendations to make those efforts more cost effective. The task force shall consider all available options as part of its recommendations. The options considered must include:

(1) fee simple acquisition of land;

(2) conservation easements;

(3) use of land owned by local governments or this state;

(4) recovery crediting; and

(5) all relevant federal programs.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 490E.005. ADVISORY COMMITTEES. (a) With the advice of the task force, the comptroller may create advisory committees to assist the task force with its work. Of the members of an advisory committee:

(1) one-third must be representatives of affected landowners;

(2) one-third must be representatives of conservation interests; and

(3) one-third must be representatives of municipalities or other affected jurisdictions.

(b) The composition of an advisory committee must provide the balance necessary to address economic, environmental, and policy issues related to the specific issue or action under consideration.

(c) The comptroller shall designate one member of an advisory committee as interim presiding officer for the purpose of calling and conducting the initial meeting of the committee.

(d) An advisory committee shall:

(1) at its initial meeting, select a presiding officer from among its members for the purpose of conducting meetings;

(2) conduct meetings as necessary to perform the business of the advisory committee; and

(3) provide recommendations to the task force as requested by the task force.

(e) Chapter 2110 does not apply to the size, composition, or duration of an advisory committee created under this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 490E.006. COORDINATION WITH OTHER ENTITIES. (a) The task force shall work in coordination with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, institutions of higher education, and agriculture and conservation organizations in performing its functions and duties.

(b) The Texas A&M University System shall, within its expertise:

(1) assist in the analysis of biological and economic impacts of proposed actions; and

(2) direct programs recommended by the task force.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 490E.007. REPORTS. The task force may provide reports as needed on:

(1) innovative programs to address endangered species issues while promoting economic growth;

(2) the activities of the task force; and

(3) recommendations for future programs or legislation.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 490E.008. ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT. The comptroller's office shall provide administrative support to the task force.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (S.B. 2534), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.